District of Columbia statutes.
2-1219.07

Repealed

Relation to other laws.

Repealed.

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 8, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(c), 45 DCR 5187
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 2401(b), 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 3, 50 DCR 896
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 233(b), 50 DCR 5668
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-286, § 3(b), 52 DCR 859
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689
1981 Ed., § 1-2295.7.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, Oct. 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-228, Mar. 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation Eminent Domain Clarification and Skyland Eminent Domain Approval Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-193, Sept. 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9804).
Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-16 amended subsec. (f) to read as follows: “(f) The Corporation and its subsidiaries shall be subject to, and comply with, section 13(d) of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective October 10, 1975 (D.C. Law 1-21; D.C. Official Code § 1-309. 10(d)); the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 25, 1977 (D. C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-531 et seq.); and the District of Columbia Public Records Management Act of 1985, effective September 5, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-19; D.C. Official Code § 2-1701 et seq.).”
Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 17-16 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2001(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and see § 2001(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2001(b) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3 and 14 of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3 and 15 of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3 and 16 of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 233(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 233(b) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of National Capital Revitalization Corporation Eminent Domain Clarification and Skyland Eminent Domain Approval Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-440, May 21, 2004, 51 DCR 5967).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of National Capital Revitalization Corporation Eminent Domain Clarification and Skyland Eminent Domain Approval Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-515, August 2,

Resolution 15-601, the “Disposition of Lot 831 in Square 560 Approval Resolution of 2004”, was approved effective July 13, 2004.

Resolution 15-811, the “Disposition of Lot 89 in Square 542 Approval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective December 21, 2004.

Resolution 16-280, the “Disposition of Lots 848 and 849 in Square 2906 Approval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective July 2, 2005.

Resolution 16-374, the “Disposition of Small Parcels Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective November 5, 2005.

Resolution 16-396, the “Disposition of Land Interest Held in Town Center East, Lots 0079, and 0816, Square 0542, Approval

Resolution of 2005“, was approved effective November 26, 2005.

Resolution 16-530, the “Disposition of Land Interest Held in 401 M Street, S.W., Lot 0089 Square 0542, Approval Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective February 19, 2006.

Resolution 16-849, the “Development of Small Parcels Resolution of 2006”, was approved effective October 27, 2006.

Resolution 17-286, the “Disposition of Lot 27 and a Portion of Lot 832 in Square 560 Emergency Approval Resolution of 2007”, was approved effective July 10, 2007.

Resolution 17-297, the “RLARC Disposition of Lots 30 and 31 in Square 2664 Emergency Approval Resolution of 2007”, was approved effective July 10, 2007.

Section 15(a) of D.C. Law 14-282 provided: “Sec. 15. Applicability. Section 3 shall apply as of June 25, 2001.”